CHAPTER 21
UNITED STATES
BRITISH HONDURAS HONDURAS
CUBA, U.S.
troops V 1898-1902 \ 1906-1909 1917-1922
Protectorate
1898-1934
leased to U.S.
* Canal Zone not a possession but controlled through a lease from Panama

■ V
DOMINICAN REPUBLIC U.S.
troops 1916-1924 Financial HAITI U.S.
troops 1915-1934 Financial Supervision 1915-194J s ATLANTIC
OCEAN
VIRGIN ISLANDS
Purchased from Denmark 1917
Caribbean Sea
ARAGUA 'roops 1909-1910 -1925,1926-1933
supervision
-1924
PUERTO RICO \
Acquired from Spain
1898
rv
BRITISH
^3UIANA
THE UNITED STATES AND LATIN AMERICA, 1895-1941
Except for Puerto Rico, the Virgin Islands, and the Canal Zone, the United States had no formal possessions in Latin America and the Caribbean in the late nineteenth century and the first half of the twentieth. But as this map reveals, the U.S. exercised considerable influence in these regions throughout this period—political and economic influence, augmented at times by military intervention. Note the particularly intrusive presence of the United States in the affairs of Cuba, Haiti, and the Dominican Republic—as well as the canal-related interventions in Colombia and Panama. * What were some of the most frequent reasons for U.S. intervention in Latin America?
The United States, he claimed, had the right not only to oppose European intervention in the Western Hemisphere but also to intervene in the domestic affairs of its neighbors if those neighbors proved unable to maintain order and national sovereignty on their own.
The immediate motivation for the Roosevelt Corollary, and the first opportunity for using it, was a crisis in the Dominican Republic. A revolution had toppled its corrupt and bankrupt government in 1903, but the new regime proved no better able to make good on the country's $22 million in debts to European nations. Roosevelt established, in effect, an American receivership, assuming control of Dominican customs and distributing 45 percent of the revenues to the Dominicans and the rest to foreign creditors. This arrangement lasted, in one form or another, for more than three decades.
In 1902, the United States granted political independence to Cuba, but only after the new government had agreed to the Platt Platt	Amendment to its constitution (see p. 545).
Amendment T^e amen^ment gave the United States the
right to prevent any other foreign power
from intruding into the new nation. In 1906, when domestic
uprisings seemed to threaten the internal stability of the island,
American troops landed in Cuba, quelled the fighting, and remained there for three years.
The Panama Canal
The most celebrated accomplishment of Roosevelt’s presidency was the construction of the Panama Canal, which linked the Atlantic and the Pacific. At first, Roosevelt and many advocates of a canal favored a route across Nicaragua, which would permit a sea-level canal requiring no locks. But they soon turned instead to the narrow Isthmus of Panama in Colombia, the site of an earlier, failed effort by a French company to construct a channel. Although the Panama route was not at sea level (and would thus require locks), it was shorter than the one in Nicaragua. And construction was already about 40 percent complete. When the French company lowered the price for its holdings, the United States chose Panama.
Roosevelt dispatched John Hay, his secretary of state, to negotiate an agreement with Colombian diplomats in Washington that would allow construction to begin without delay. Under heavy American pressure, the Colombian charge d affaires, Tomas Herren, unwisely signed an agreement giving
AMERICA AND THE GREAT WAR
■ 587 the United States perpetual rights to a six-mile-wide "canal
zone’across Colombia. The outraged Colombian senate refused
to ratify it. Colombia then sent a new representative to
Washington with instructions to demand a higher payment
from the Americans plus a share of the payment to the French.
Roosevelt was furious and began to look for ways to circumvent the Colombian government. Philippe Bunau-Varilla, chief engineer of the French canal project, was a ready ally. In November 1903, he helped organize and finance a revolution in Panama.
Panamanian There had been many Previous revolts, all of
Revolt them failures, but this one had the support of the United States. Roosevelt landed troops from the USS Nashville in Panama to "maintain order.” Their presence prevented Colombian forces from suppressing the rebellion, and three days later Roosevelt recognized Panama as an independent nation. The new Panamanian government quickly agreed to the terms the Colombian senate had rejected. Work on
the canal proceeded rapidly, and it opened in 1914.
Taft and "Dollar Diplomacy”
Like his predecessor, William Howard Taft worked to advance the nation’s economic interests overseas. But he showed little interest in Roosevelt’s larger vision of world stability. Taft’s
secretary of state, the corporate attorney Philander C. Knox, worked aggressively to extend American investments into less developed regions. Critics called his policies "Dollar Diplomacy.”
It was particularly visible in the Caribbean. When a revolution broke out in Nicaragua in 1909, the administration quickly
,	sided with the insurgents (who had been
Intervention	.	,	. , A
in Nicaragua insPired t0 revolt bY an American mining
company) and sent troops into the country to seize the customs houses. As soon as peace was restored, Knox encouraged American bankers to offer substantial loans to the new government, thus increasing Washington’s financial leverage over the country. When the new pro-American government faced an insurrection less than two years later, Taft again landed troops in Nicaragua, this time to protect the existing regime. The troops remained there for more than a decade.
Diplomacy and Morality
Woodrow Wilson entered the presidency with relatively little interest or experience in international affairs. Yet he faced international challenges of a scope and gravity unmatched by those of any president before him. In many respects, he continued-and even strengthened-the Roosevelt-Taft approach to foreign policy.

October 1914 to admit the first ship to pass through the channel. The construction of tfre canal was
OPENING THE PANAMA CANAL
The great Miraflores locks of the ^"^^"^TXtsoTTheodore Roosevelt were at least equally important to its completion. (© Bettmann/Corbis) W of the great engineering feats of the early twentieth century. But the heavy-handed poht.cal efforts 588 . CHAPTER 21
Having already seized control of the finances of the Dominican Republic in 1905, the United States established a military government there in 1916. The military occupation lasted eight years. In neighboring Haiti, Wilson landed marines in 1915 to quell a revolution, in the course of which a mob had murdered an unpopular president. American military forces remained in the country until 1934, and American officers drafted the new Haitian constitution adopted in 1918. When Wilson began to fear that the Danish West Indies might be about to fall into the hands of Germany, he bought the colony from Denmark and renamed it the Virgin Islands. Concerned about the possibility of European influence in Nicaragua, he signed a treaty with that country's government ensuring that no other nation would build a canal there and winning for the United States the right to intervene in Nicaragua to protect American interests.
But Wilson’s view of America’s role in the world was not entirely similar to the views of his predecessors, as became
Wilson’s	C^ear in ^is ^ea^in^s wit^ Mexico. For
Moral	many years, under the friendly auspices of
Diplomacy the corrupt dictator Porfirio Diaz, American businessmen had been establishing an enormous economic presence in Mexico. In 1910, however, Diaz had been overthrown by the popular leader Francisco Madero, who seemed hostile to American businesses in Mexico. The United States quietly encouraged a reactionary general, Victoriano Huerta, to depose Madero early in 1913, and the Taft administration, in its last weeks in office, prepared to recognize the new Huerta regime and welcome back a receptive environment for American investments in Mexico. Before it could do so, however, the new
government murdered Madero, shortly before Woodrow Wilson took office in Washington. The new president instantly announced that he would never recognize Huerta’s "government of butchers.”
At first, Wilson hoped that simply by refusing to recognize Huerta he could help topple the regime and bring to power the opposing Constitutionalists, led by Venustiano Carranza. But when Huerta, with the support of American business interests, established a full military dictatorship in October 1913, the president became more assertive. In April 1914, an officer in Huerta’s army briefly arrested several American sailors from the USS Dolphin who had gone ashore in Tampico, on Mexico’s east coast. The men were immediately released, but the American admiral-unsatisfied with the apology he received-demanded that the Huerta forces fire a twenty-one-gun salute to the American flag as a public display of penance. The Mexicans refused. Wilson used the trivial incident as a pretext for seizing the Mexican port of Veracruz.
Wilson had envisioned a bloodless action, but in a clash with Mexican troops in Veracruz, the Americans killed 126
Veracruz Mexican soldiers and suffered 19 casualties of their own. Now at the brink of war,
Wilson began to look for a way out. His show of force, however, had helped strengthen the position of the Carranza faction, which captured Mexico City in August and forced Huerta to flee the country. At last, it seemed, the crisis might be over.
But Wilson was not yet satisfied. He reacted angrily when Carranza refused to accept American guidelines for the creation of a new government, and he briefly considered throwing his support to still another aspirant to leadership: Carranza’s
PANCHO VILLA AND HIS TROOPS
Pancho Villa (fourth from left in the front row) poses with some of the leaders of his army, whose members Americans came to consider bandits once they began staging raids across the U.S. border. He was a national hero in Mexico. (The Library of Congress (LC-DIG-ggbain-29882))
AMERICA AND THE GREAT WAR
• 589 erstwhile lieutenant Pancho Villa, who was now leading a rebel army of his own. When Villa’s military position deteriorated, however, Wilson abandoned him and finally, in October 1915, granted preliminary recognition to the Carranza government. By now, however, he had created yet another crisis. Villa, angry at what he considered an American betrayal, retaliated in January 1916 by shooting sixteen American mining engineers in northern Mexico. Two months later, he led his soldiers (or "bandits,” as the United States called them) across the border into Columbus, New Mexico, where they killed seventeen more Americans.
With the permission of the Carranza government, Wilson ordered General John J. Pershing to lead an American expedi-Intervention tionarY force across the Mexican border in in Mexico pursuit of Villa. The American troops never found Villa, but they did engage in two ugly skirmishes with Carranza’s army, in which forty Mexicans and twelve Americans died. Again, the United States and Mexico stood at the brink of war. But at the last minute, Wilson drew back. He quietly withdrew American troops from Mexico, and in March 1917, he at last granted formal recognition to the Carranza regime. By now, however, Wilson’s attention was turning elsewhere-to the far greater international crisis engulfing the European continent and ultimately much of the world.
THE ROAD TO WAR
The causes of the war in Europe-indeed the question of whether there were any significant causes at all, or whether the entire conflict was the result of a tragic series of blunders-have been the subject of continued debate for nearly a century. What is clear is that the European nations had by 1914 created an unusually precarious international system that careened into war very quickly on the basis of what most historians agree was a relatively minor series of provocations.
The Collapse of the European Peace
The major powers of Europe were organized by 1914 in two great, competing alliances. The "Triple Entente” linked Britain, France, and Russia. The "Triple Alliance” united Germany, the Austro-Hungarian Empire, and Italy. The chief rivalry, however, was not between the two alliances, but between the
Competing great Powers that dominated them: Great
Alliances Britain and Germany-the former long established as the world’s most powerful colonial and commercial nation, the latter ambitious to expand its own empire and become at least Britain’s equal. The Anglo-German rivalry may have been the most important underlying source of the tensions that led to World War I, but it was not the immediate cause of its outbreak. The conflict emerged most directly out of a controversy involving nationalist movements within the Austro-Hungarian Empire. On June 28, 1914, Archduke Franz Ferdinand, heir to the throne of the tottering
empire, was assassinated while paying a state visit to Sarajevo. Sarajevo was the capital of Bosnia, a province of Austria-Hungary that Slavic nationalists wished to annex to neighboring Serbia; the archduke’s assassin was a Serbian nationalist.
This local controversy quickly escalated through the workings of the system of alliances that the great powers had constructed. With support from Germany, Austria-Hungary launched a punitive assault on Serbia. The Serbians called on Russia to help with their defense. The Russians began mobilizing their army on July 30. Things quickly careened out of control. By August 3, Germany had declared war on both Russia and France and had invaded Belgium in preparation for a thrust across the French border. On August 4, Great Britain-ostensibly to honor its alliance with France but, more importantly, to blunt the advance of its principal rival-declared war on Germany. Russia and the Austro-Hungarian Empire formally began hostilities on August 6. Italy, although an ally of Germany in 1914, remained neutral at first and later entered the war on the side of the British and French. The Ottoman Empire (centered in Turkey) and other, smaller nations all joined the fighting later in 1914 or in 1915. Within less than a year, virtually the entire European continent and part of Asia were embroiled in a catastrophic war.
Wilson's Neutrality
Wilson called on his fellow citizens in 1914 to remain "impartial in thought as well as deed.” But that was an impossible task, for several reasons. Some Americans sympathized with the German cause (German Americans because of affection for Germany, Irish Americans because of hatred of Britain). Many more (including Wilson himself) sympathized with Britain. Wilson was only one of many Americans who fervently admired England-its traditions, its culture, its political system; almost instinctively, these Americans attributed to the cause of the Allies (Britain, France, Italy, Russia) a moral quality that they denied to the Central Powers (Germany, the Austro-Hungarian Empire, and the Ottoman Empire). Lurid reports of German atrocities in Belgium and France, skillfully exaggerated by British propagandists, strengthened the hostility of many Americans toward Germany.
Economic realities also made it impossible for the United States to deal with the belligerents on equal terms. The British had imposed a naval blockade on Germany to prevent muni-
Economic Ties tions an<^ suPP^ies fr°m reaching the enemy. to Britain As a neutral, the United States had the right, in theory, to trade with both Britain and
Germany; but for Americans to trade with Germany, they would have to defy the British blockade. A truly neutral response to the blockade would have been to stop trading with Britain as well. But while the United States could survive an interruption of its relatively modest trade with the Central Powers, it could not easily weather an embargo on its much more extensive trade with the Allies, particularly when war orders from Britain and France soared after 1914, helping to produce one of the greatest economic booms in the nation’s history. So America
590 * CHAPTER 21
IT IS FAR BETTER
TO FACE THE BULLETS
THAN TO BE KILLED
AT HOME BY A BOMB
JOIN THE ARMY AT ONCE &HELPTO STOPAN AIR RAID COD SAVE THE KINC
BULLETS BETTER THAN BOMBS?
At the beginning of World War I, Britain largely relied on a volunteer army. To attract recruits, the government used propaganda posters such as the one shown here. While this was very successful in attracting recruits, the need for soldiers was enormous, compelling Parliament to enact in January 1916 a Military Service Bill that introduced conscription. By the end of the war, more than 5 million men had joined up. {© Archive Photos/Alamy)
tacitly ignored the blockade of Germany and continued trading with Britain. By 1915, the United States had gradually transformed itself from a neutral power into the arsenal of the Allies.
The Germans, in the meantime, were resorting to a new and, in American eyes, barbaric tactic: submarine warfare. Unable to challenge British domination on the ocean’s surface, Germany began early in 1915 to use the newly improved submarine to try to stem the flow of supplies to England. Enemy vessels, the Germans announced, would be sunk on sight. Months later, on
Lusitania May 7, 1915, a German submarine sank the British passenger liner Lusitania without warning, causing the deaths of 1,198 people, 128 of them Americans. The ship was, it later became clear, carrying both passengers and munitions; but most Americans considered the
attack what Theodore Roosevelt called it: "an act of piracy.”
Wilson angrily demanded that Germany promise not to
repeat such outrages and that the Central Powers affirm their
commitment to neutral rights. The Germans finally agreed to Wilson’s demands, but tensions between the nations continued to grow. Early in 1916, in response to an announcement that the Allies were now arming merchant ships to sink submarines, Germany proclaimed that it would fire on such vessels without warning. A few weeks later Germany attacked the unarmed French steamer Sussex, injuring several American passengers. Again Wilson demanded that Germany abandon its "unlawful” tactics; again the German government relented, still hoping to keep America out of the war.
Preparedness versus Pacifism
Despite the president’s increasing bellicosity in 1916, he was still far from ready to commit the United States to war. One obstacle was American domestic politics. Facing a difficult battle for reelection, Wilson could not ignore the powerful factions that continued to oppose intervention.
The question of whether America should make military and economic preparations for war provided the first issue over which pacifists and interventionists could openly debate. Wilson at first sided with the antipreparedness forces, denouncing the idea of an American military buildup as needless and provocative. As tensions between the United States and Germany grew, however, he changed his mind. In the fall of 1915, he endorsed an ambitious proposal for a large and rapid increase in the nation’s armed forces. Amid expressions of outrage from pacifists in Congress and elsewhere, he worked hard to win approval of it, even embarking on a national speaking tour early in 1916 to arouse support for the proposal.
Still, the peace faction wielded considerable political strength, as became clear at the Democratic Convention in the summer 1916 Election	°f 1916. The convention became especially
enthusiastic when the keynote speaker punctuated his list of Wilson’s diplomatic achievements with the chant "What did we do? What did we do?... We didn’t go to war! We didn’t go to war!” That speech helped produce one of the most prominent slogans of Wilson’s reelection campaign: He kept us out of war.” During the campaign, Wilson did nothing to discourage those who argued that the Republican candidate, the progressive New York governor Charles Evans Hughes (supported by the bellicose Theodore Roosevelt), was more likely than he to lead the nation into war. And when pro-war rhetoric became particularly heated, Wilson spoke defiantly of the nation being "too proud to fight.” He ultimately won reelection by a small margin: fewer than 600,000 popular votes and only 23 electoral votes. The Democrats retained
a precarious control over Congress.
A
War for Democracy The election was behind him, and tensions between the United States and Germany remained high. But Wilson still required a justification for American intervention that would unite public opinion and satisfy his own sense of morality, m t e end, he created that rationale himself. The United States,
AMERICA AND THE GREAT WAR
591
Wilson insisted, had no material aims in the conflict. Rather, the nation was committed to using the war as a vehicle for constructing a new world order, one based on some of the same progressive ideals that had motivated reform in America. In a speech before Congress in January 1917, he presented a plan for a postwar order in which the United States would help maintain peace through a permanent league of nations-a peace that would ensure self-determination for all nations, a "peace without victory.” These were, Wilson believed, goals worth fighting for if there was sufficient provocation. Provocation came quickly.
In January, after months of inconclusive warfare in the
trenches of France, the military leaders of Germany decided
on one last dramatic gamble to achieve victory. They launched
a series of major assaults on the enemy's lines in France. At the
same time, they began unrestricted submarine warfare (against
American as well as Allied ships) to cut Britain off from vital
supplies. The Allied defenses would collapse, they hoped,
„	before the United States could intervene.
Zimmermann
Telegram The new German policy made American entry into the war virtually inevitable.
Two additional events helped clear the way. On February 25,
Candidate (Party)
Woodrow Wilson (Democratic)
Charles E. Hughes (Republican)
A. L.
Benson (Socialist)
Other parties	, x
(Prohibition; Socialist Labor)
Electoral Vote	Popular Vote (%)
277	9,129,606 (49.4)
254	8,538,221 (46.2)
—	585,113 (3.2)
—	233,909
61.6% of electorate voting
ELECTION OF 1916
Woodrow Wilson had good reason to be concerned about his reelection prospects in 1916. He had won only about 42 percent of the vote in 1912, and the Republican Party—which had been divided four years earlier was now reunited around the Popular Charles Evans Hughes. In the end, Wilson won a narrow victory over Hughes with just under 50 percent of the vote and an even narrower margin in the electoral college. Note the striking regional character of his victory. How did Wilson use the war in Europe to bolster his election prospects.
the British gave Wilson a telegram intercepted from the German foreign minister, Arthur Zimmermann, to the government of Mexico. It proposed that in the event of war between Germany and the United States, the Mexicans should join with Germany against the Americans to regain their "lost provinces” (Texas and much of the rest of the American Southwest) when the war was over. Widely publicized by British propagandists and in the American press, the Zimmermann telegram inflamed public opinion and helped build popular sentiment for war. A few weeks later, in March 1917, a revolution in Russia toppled the reactionary czarist regime and replaced it with a new, republican government. The United States would now be spared the embarrassment of allying itself with what most Americans considered a despotic monarchy.
On the rainy evening of April 2, two weeks after German submarines had torpedoed three American ships, Wilson appeared before a joint session of Congress and asked for a declaration of war:
It is a fearful thing to lead this great peaceful people into war, into the most terrible and disastrous of all wars, civilization itself seeming to be in the balance. But the right is more precious than peace, and we shall fight for the things which we have always carried nearest our hearts-for democracy, for the right of those who submit to authority to have a voice in their own Governments, for the rights and liberties of small nations, for a universal dominion of right by such a concert of free peoples as shall bring peace and safety to all nations and make the world itself at last free.
Even then, opposition remained. For four days, pacifists in Congress carried on a futile struggle. When the declaration of war finally passed on April 6, fifty representatives and six senators voted against it.
WITHOUT STINT”
Armies on both sides in Europe were decimated and exhausted by the time of Woodrow Wilson’s declaration of war. The German offensives of early 1917 had failed to produce an end to the struggle, and French and British counteroffensives had
Stalemate accomplished little beyond adding to the casualties. The Allies looked to the United
States for help. Wilson, who had called on the nation to wage war "without stint or limit,” was ready to oblige.
Entering the War
By the spring of 1917, Great Britain was suffering such vast losses from attacks by German submarines-one of every four ships setting sail from British ports never returned-that its ability to continue receiving vital supplies from across the Atlantic was in question. Within weeks of joining the war, a fleet of American destroyers began aiding the British navy in its assault on German submarines. Other American warships
592 ♦ CHAPTER 21
escorted merchant vessels across the Atlantic. Americans also helped sow antisubmarine mines in the North Sea. The results were dramatic. Sinkings of Allied ships had totaled nearly 900,000 tons in April 1917; by December, the figure had dropped to 350,000, and by October 1918 to 112,000. The convoys also helped the United States protect its own soldiers en route to Europe. No American troop ship was lost at sea in World War I.
Many Americans had hoped that providing naval assistance alone would be enough to turn the tide in the war, but it quickly became clear that American ground forces would also be neces-Russian sarY t0 sh°re UP t^le totterin8 Allies. Britain
Revolution an^ France had few remaining reserves. By early 1918, Russia had withdrawn from the war. After the Bolshevik Revolution in November 1917, the new government, led by V.I. Lenin, negotiated a hasty and costly peace with the Central Powers, thus freeing additional German
troops to fight on the western front.
The American Expeditionary Force
There were only about 120,000 soldiers in the army in 1917 and perhaps 80,000 more in the National Guard. Neither group had any combat experience; and except for the small number
of officers who had participated in the Spanish-American War two decades before and the Mexican intervention of 1916, few commanders had any experience in battle either.
Some politicians urged a voluntary recruitment process to raise the needed additional forces. Among the advocates of this approach was Theodore Roosevelt, now old and ill, who swallowed his hatred of Wilson and called on him at the White House with an offer to raise a regiment to fight in Europe. Wilson rejected his offer. In the new age of warfare, he sensed, the old tradition of civilians becoming officers and recruiting troops (a common practice in the Civil War), seemed obsolete. The president and his secretary of war, Newton D. Baker, decided that only a national draft could provide the needed men; and despite the protests of those who agreed with
„	House Speaker Champ Clark that There is
Selective
Service Act precious little difference between a con-........script and a convict,” he won passage of the
Selective Service Act in mid-May. The draft brought nearly 3 million men into the army; another 2 million joined various branches of the armed services voluntarily. Together, they formed what became known as the American Expeditionary Force (AEF).
It was the first time in American history that any substantial number of soldiers and sailors had fought overseas for an
THE WARTIME DRAFT
The World War I draft was the first centrally organized effort by the federal qo Although some Americans evaded the draft in 1917 and 1918 (and were reviled by others as "shirkers”)	to re9uire military service from its citizens.
Congress (LC-DIG-npcc-00293)}	' m°S of those drafted complied with the law. (The Library of
AMERICA AND THE GREAT WAR
• 593 A WOMEN’S MOTOR CORPS
Although the most important new role that women performed during World War I was probably working in factories that male workers had left, many women also enlisted in auxiliary branches of the military—among them these uniformed women who served as drivers for the U.S. Army. (The Library of Congress (LC-DIG-ggbain-26109)) extended period. The military did its best to keep up morale among men who spent most of their time living in the trenches, but it was a difficult task. The trenches were frequently shelled and even when calm were muddy, polluted, and infested with rats. But when soldiers had time away from the front, they were usually less interested in the facilities the Red Cross tried to make available for them than in exploring the bars and brothels of local towns. More than one in every ten American soldiers in Europe contracted venereal disease during World War I, which inspired elaborate official efforts to prevent infection and to treat it when it occurred.
In some respects, the AEF was the most diverse fighting force the United States had ever assembled. For the first time, women were permitted to enlist in the military-more than ten thousand in the navy and a few hundred in the marines. They were not allowed to participate in combat, but they served auxiliary roles in hospitals and offices.
Nearly 400,000 African Americans enlisted in or were drafted into the army and navy as well. (The marines would not accept them.) And while most of them performed menial tasks on military bases in the United States, more than 50,000
African went to France. African American soldiers
American served in segregated, all-black units under
Soldiers white commanders; and even in Europe, most of them were assigned to noncombat duty. But some black units fought valiantly in the great offensives of 1918. Most African American soldiers learned to live with the racism they encountered-in part because they hoped their military service would ultimately improve their status. But a few responded to provocations violently. In August 1917, a group of black soldiers in Houston, Texas, subjected to continuing abuse by people in the community, used military
weapons to kill seventeen whites. Thirteen African American soldiers were hanged, and another forty were sentenced to life terms in military jails.
Having assembled this first genuinely national army, the War Department permitted the American Psychological Association to study it. The psychologists gave thousands of soldiers new tests designed to measure intelligence: the "Intelligence Quotient,” or *IQ,” test and other newly designed aptitude tests. In fact, the tests were less effective in measuring intelligence than in measuring education; and they reflected the educational expectations of the white middle-class people who had devised them. Half the whites and the vast majority of the African Americans taking the test scored at levels that classified them as "morons.” In reality, most of them were simply people who had not had much access to education.
The Military Struggle
The engagement of these forces in combat was intense but brief. Not until the spring of 1918 were significant numbers
_	of American ground troops available for
Pershing	battle. Eight months later, the war was
over. Under the command of General
John J. Pershing, who had only recently led the unsuccessful American pursuit of Pancho Villa, the American Expeditionary Force-although it retained a command structure independent of the other Allies-joined the existing Allied forces.
The experience of American troops during World War I was very different from those of other nations, which had already been fighting for nearly four years by the time the U.S. forces arrived in significant numbers. British, French, German, and other troops had by then spent years living in the vast
594 » CHAPTER 21
LIFE IN THE TRENCHES
For most British, French, German, and ultimately American troops in France, the most debilitating part of World War I was the seeming endlessness of life in the trenches. Some young men lived in these cold, wet, muddy dugouts for months, even years, surrounded by filth, sharing their space with vermin, eating mostly rotten food. Occasional attacks to try to dislodge the enemy from its trenches usually ended in failure and became the scenes of terrible slaughters. (National Archives and Records Administration (NWDNS-111-SC-12151)) network of trenches that had been dug into the French countryside. Modern weapons made conventional, frontal battles a recipe for mass suicide. Instead, the two sides relied on heavy shelling of each other’s trenches and occasional, usually inconclusive, and always murderous assaults across the "no-man’s land” dividing them. Life in the trenches was almost indescribably terrible. The trenches were places of extraordinary physical stress and discomfort. They were also places of intense boredom, laced with fear. By the time the Americans arrived, morale on both sides was declining, and many soldiers had come to believe that the war would be virtually endless.
Chateau-
Thierry
Although the American forces had trench experiences of their own, they were very brief compared to those of the European armies. Instead, the United States tipped the balance of power in the battle and made it possible for the Allies at last to break out of their entrenched positions and advance against the Germans. In early June 1918, American forces at Chateau-Thierry assisted the French in repel-
ling a German offensive that had brought German forces within fifty miles of Paris. Six weeks later, after over a million American troops had flooded into France, the Americans helped turn away another assault, at Rheims, farther south. By July 18, the Allies had halted the German advance and were beginning a successful offensive of their own.
On September 26, the American fighting force joined a large assault against the Germans in the Argonne Forest that lasted nearly seven weeks. By the end of October, despite terrible weather, they had helped push the Germans back toward their own border and had cut the
enemy’s major supply lines to the front.
Faced with an invasion of their own country, German military leaders now began to seek an armistice-an immediate cease-fire that would, they hoped, serve as a prelude to negotiations among the belligerents. Pershing wanted to drive on into Germany itself; but other Allied leaders, after first insisting on terms that made the agreement little different from a surrender, accepted the German proposal. On November 11, 1918, the Great War shuddered to a close.
Meuse-
Argonne
Offensive
The New Technology of Warfare
World War I was a proving ground for a range of military and other technologies. The trench warfare that characterized the conflict was necessary because of the enormous destructive power of newly improved machine guns and higher-powered artillery. It was no longer feasible to send troops out into an open field, or even to allow them to camp in the open. The new weaponry would slaughter them in an instant. Trenches sheltered troops while allowing limited, and usually inconclusive, fighting. But technology overtook the trenches, too, as mobile weapons—tanks and flamethrowers-proved capable of piercing entrenched positions. Most terrible of all, new chemical weapons—poisonous mustard gas, which required troops to carry gas masks at all times-made it possible to attack entrenched soldiers without direct combat.
The new forms of technological warfare required elaborate maintenance. Faster machine guns needed more ammunition. Motorized vehicles required fuel and spare parts and mechanics capable of servicing them. The logistical difficulties of supply became a major factor in planning tactics and strategy-Late in the war, when advancing toward Germany, Allied armies frequently had to stop for days at a time to wait for their equipment to catch up with them.
AMERICA AND THE GREAT WAR
• 595 North Sea
ENGLAND
NETHERLANDS
Allied nations		Neutral nations
Central Powers	—	National boundaries, 1914
Areas occupied by Central Powers		BATTLES
Territory gained in German offensives, Spring 1918		Allied victories
TROOP MOVEMENTS FRONT LINES
	► U.S. troops	—	Battle line, July 18,1918
	► Other Allied forces	—	Armistice line, Nov. 11,1918
AMERICA IN WORLD WAR I: THE WESTERN FRONT, 1918
These maps show the principal battles in which the United States participated in the last year of World War I. The small map on the upper right helps locate the area of conflict within the larger European landscape. The larger map at left shows the long, snaking red line of the western front in France—stretching from the border between France and southwest Germany all the way to the northeast border between Belgium and France. Along that vast line, the two sides had been engaged in murderous, inconclusive warfare for over three years by the time the Americans arrived. Beginning in the spring and summer of 1918, bolstered by reinforcements from the United States, the Allies began to win a series of important victories that finally enabled them to begin pushing the Germans back. American troops, as this map makes clear, were decisive along the southern part of the front. * Af what point did the Germans begin to consider putting an end to the war?
World War I was the first conflict in which airplanes played a significant role. The planes themselves were relatively simple and not very maneuverable; but anti-aircraft technology was not yet highly developed either, so their effectiveness was still considerable. Planes began to be constructed to serve various functions: bombers, fighters (planes that would engage in "dogfights” with other planes), and reconaissance aircraft.
The most "modern” part of the military during World War I was the navy. New battleships emerged-of which the British Dreadnought was perhaps the most visible example-that made use of new technologies such as turbine propulsion, hydraulic gun controls, electric light and power, wireless telegraphy, and advanced navigational aids. Submarines, which had made a brief appearance in the American Civil War, now became significant weapons (as the German U-boat campaign in 1915 and 1916 made clear). The new submarines
were driven by diesel engines, which had the advantage of being more compact than a steam engine and whose fuel was less explosive than that of a gasoline engine. The diesel engine also had a much greater range than ships powered by
other fuels.
The new technologies were to a large degree responsible for the most stunning and horrible characteristic of World
Car I-its appalling level of casualties. A million men representing the British Empire (Britain, Canada, Australia, India, and others) died. France lost 1.7 million men; Germany, 2 million; the for-
High
Casualty
Rates
ancrm-Hiiriparian Emnire. 1.5 million;
Italy, 460,000; and Russia, 1.7 million. The number of Turkish dead, which was surely large, was never known. In Britain, one-third of the men born between 1892 and 1895 died in the war. Similarly terrible percentages could be calculated for other warring nations. Even greater numbers of men returned
596 * CHAPTER 21

home with injuries, some of them permanently crippling. The United States, which entered the war near its end and became engaged only in the last successful offensives, suffered very light casualties in comparison-112,000 dead, half of them victims of influenza, not battle. But the American casualties were very high in the battles in which U.S. troops were centrally involved.
THE WAR AND AMERICAN
SOCIETY
The American experience in World War I was relatively brief, but it had profound effects on the government, the economy, and society. Mobilizing an industrial economy for total war required an unprecedented degree of government involvement in industry, agriculture, and other areas. It also required, many Americans believed, a strenuous effort to ensure the loyalty and commitment of the people.
Organizing the Economy for War
Financing the War
By the time the war ended, the U.S. government had spent $32 billion for expenses directly related to the conflict. This was a staggering sum by the standards of the time. The entire federal budget had seldom exceeded $1 billion before 1915,
and as recently as 1910 the nation’s entire gross national product had been only $35 billion. To finance the war, the government relied on two devices. First, it launched a major drive to solicit loans from the American people by selling "Liberty Bonds” to the public. By 1920, the sale of bonds, to both individuals and institutions, accompanied by elaborate patriotic appeals, had produced $23 billion. At the same time, new taxes were bringing in an additional sum of nearly $10 billion-some from levies on the "excess profits” of corporations, much from new, steeply graduated income and inheritance taxes that ultimately rose as high as 70 percent in some brackets.
An even greater challenge was organizing the economy to meet war needs. In 1916, Wilson established a Council of National Defense, composed of members of his cabinet, and a Civilian Advisory Commission, which set up local defense councils in every state and locality. Economic mobilization, according to this first plan, was to rest on a dispersal of power to local communities.
But this early administrative structure soon proved unworkable. Some members of the Council of National Defense, many of them disciples of the social engineering gospel of Thorstein Veblen and the "scientific management” principles of Frederick Winslow Taylor, urged a centralized approach. Instead of dividing the economy geographically, they proposed dividing it functionally by organizing a series of planning bodies, each to supervise a specific sector of the economy. The administrative structure that slowly emerged
from such proposals was dominated by a series of "war boards,” one to oversee the railroads, one to supervise fuel supplies (largely coal), another to handle food (a board that helped elevate to prominence the brilliant young engineer and business executive Herbert Hoover). The boards generally succeeded in meeting essential war needs without paralyzing
War
Industries
Board
the domestic economy.
At the center of the effort to rationalize the economy was the War Industries Board (WIB), an agency created in July 1917 to coordinate government purchases of military supplies. Casually organized at first, it stumbled badly until March 1918, when Wilson restructured it and placed it
under the control of the Wall Street financier Bernard Baruch. From then on, the board wielded powers greater (in theory at least) than any other government agency had ever possessed. Baruch decided which factories would convert to the production of which war materials and set prices for the goods they produced. When materials were scarce, Baruch decided to whom they should go. When corporations were competing for government contracts, he chose among them. He was, it seemed, providing the centralized regulation of the economy that some progressives had long urged.
In reality, the celebrated efficiency of the WIB was something of a myth. The agency was, in fact, plagued by mismanagement and inefficiency. Its apparent success rested in large part on the sheer extent of American resources and productive capacities. Nor was the WIB in any real sense an example of state control of the economy. Baruch viewed himself as the partner of business; and within the WIB, businessmen themselves-the so-called dollar-a-year men, who took paid leave from their corporate jobs and worked for the government for a token salary-supervised the affairs of the private economy. Baruch ensured that manufacturers who coordinated their efforts with his goals would be exempt from antitrust laws. He helped major industries earn enormous profits from their efforts.
The effort to organize the economy for war produced some spectacular accomplishments: Hoover’s efficient organization of domestic food supplies, William McAdoo’s success in untangling the railroads, and others. In some areas, however, progress was so slow that the war was over before many of the supplies ordered
Lessons of	^or were ready. Even so, many leaders of
the Managed	both government and industry emerged
Economy from the experience convinced of the advantages of a close, cooperative relationship between the public and private sectors. Some hoped to continue
the wartime experiments in peacetime.
Labor and the War
The growing link between the public and private sectors extended, although in greatly different form, to labor. The National War Labor Board, established in April 1918 to resolve labor disputes, pressured industry to grant important concessions to workers: an eight-hour day, the maintenance of
AMERICA AND THE GREAT WAR * 597
minimal living standards, equal pay for women doing equal work, recognition of the right of unions to organize and bargain collectively. In return, it insisted that workers forgo all strikes and that employers not engage in lockouts. Membership in labor unions increased by more than 1.5 million between 1917 and 1919.
The war provided workers with important, if usually temporary, gains. But it did not stop labor militancy. That was particularly clear in the West, where the Western Federation of Miners staged a series of strikes to improve the terrible conditions in the underground mines. The bloodiest of them occurred just before the war. In Ludlow, Colorado, in 1914, workers (mostly Italians, Greeks, and Slavs) walked out of coal mines owned by John D. Rockefeller. Joined by their wives and daughters, they continued the strike even after they had been evicted from company housing and had moved into hastily erected tents. The state militia was called into the town to
protect the mines, but in fact (as was often the case), it actually worked to help employers defeat the strikers.
Joined by strikebreakers and others, the militia attacked the workers’ tent colony; and in the battle that followed, thirty-nine people died, among them eleven children. But these events, which became known as the Ludlow Massacre, were only precursors
to continued conflict in the mines that the war itself did little to discourage.
Economic and Social
Results of the War
Whatever its other effects, the war helped produce a remarkable period of economic growth in the United States-a boom that began in 1914 (when European demands for American products began to increase) and accelerated after
Ludlow
Massacre
THE TOWN IN HARLEM
Harlem, once a suburb of Manhattan where middle-class commuters lived, became in The Lafayette Theatre was the first New York theater to desegregate, in as early as 1912. African American theatergoers cou si in Practice in other New York theaters. (© John Springer Collection/Corbis) the early twentieth century the center of African American life in New York, the orchestra section rather than just in the balcony as was the
598 ® CHAPTER 21
WOMEN INDUSTRIAL WORKERS
In World War II, such women were often called "Rosie the Riveter." Their presence in these previously all-male work environments was no less startling to Americans during World War I. These women are shown working with acetylene torches to bevel armor plate for tanks. (Photo by Margaret Bourke-White/'© Time & Life Psctures/Getty Images) 1917 (in response to demand from the United States war effort). Industrial production soared, and manufacturing activity expanded in regions that had previously had relatively little of it. The shipbuilding industry, for example, grew rapidly on the West Coast (enabled by the Panama Canal). Employment increased dramatically; and because so many white men were away at war, new opportunities for female, African American, Mexican, and Asian workers appeared. Some workers experienced a significant growth in income, but inflation cut into the wage increases and often produced a net loss in purchasing power. The agricultural economy profited from the war as well. Farm prices rose to their highest levels in decades, and agricultural production increased dramatically as a result.
One of the most important social changes of the war years was the migration of hundreds of thousands of African Americans from the rural South into northern industrial cities. It became known as the '"Great Migration.” Like most «Great	migrations, it was a result of both a "push”
Migration”	and a "pull.” The push was the poverty,
indebtedness, racism, and violence many black men and women experienced in the South. The pull was the prospect of factory jobs in the urban North and the opportunity to live in communities where blacks could enjoy more freedom and autonomy. In the labor-scarce economy of the war years, northern factory owners dispatched agents to the South to recruit African American workers. Black newspapers advertised the prospects for employment in the North. And perhaps most important, those who migrated sent word back to friends and families of the opportunities they encoun-tered-which explains the heavy concentration of migrants from a single area of the South in certain cities in the North. In Chicago, for example, the more than 70,000 new black residents came disproportionately from a few areas of Alabama
and Mississippi.
The result was a dramatic growth in black communities in northern industrial cities such as New York, Chicago, Cleveland, and Detroit. Some older, more established African American residents of these cities were unsettled by these new arrivals, with their country ways and their revivalistic religion; many people in the existing African American communities considered the newcomers coarse and feared that their presence would increase their own vulnerability to white racism. But the movement could not be stopped. New churches sprang up in black neighborhoods (many of them simple storefronts, from which self-proclaimed preachers searched for congregations). Low-paid black workers crowded into inadequate housing. As Race Riots	black communities expanded, they
inevitably began to rub up against white neighborhoods, with occasionally violent results. In East St. Louis, Illinois, a white mob attacked a black neighborhood on July 2, 1917, burned down many houses, and shot the residents of some of them as they fled. As many as forty African
Americans died.
For American women, black and white, the war meant new opportunities for employment. A million or more women worked in a wide range of industrial jobs that, in peacetime, were considered male preserves: steel, munitions, trucking, public transportation. Most of them had been working in other, lower-paying jobs. But whatever changes the war brought were temporary ones. As soon as the war was over, almost all of the women working in previously male industrial jobs quit or were fired; in fact, the percentage of women working for wages actually declined between 1910 and 1920. The government had created the Women in Industry Board to oversee the movement of these women into the jobs left ehind by men. After the war, the board became the Womens Bureau, a permanent agency dedicated to protecting the
interests of women in the workforce.
AMERICA AND THE GREAT WAR 599
the futile search
FOR SOCIAL UNITY
The idea of unity not only in the direction of the economy but in the nation's social purpose as well-had been the dream of many progressives for decades. To them, the war seemed to offer an unmatched opportunity for America to close ranks behind a great common cause. In the process, they hoped, society could achieve a lasting sense of collective purpose. The dream of social unity helped drive many efforts-the peace movement, the labor movement, and even the government. But it also drove a period of political and social oppression and an egregious violation of civil liberties.
The Peace Movement
Woman's Peace Party
Government leaders, and many others, realized that public sentiment about American involvement in the war had been deeply divided before April 1917 and remained so even after the declaration of war.
The peace movement in the United States before 1917 had many constituencies: German Americans, Irish Americans, religious pacifists (Quakers, Mennonites, and others), intellectuals and groups on the left such as the Socialist Party and the Industrial Workers of the World, all of whom considered the war a meaningless battle among capitalist nations for commercial supremacy-an opinion many others, in America and Europe, later came to share. But the most active and widespread peace
activism came from the women’s movement. In 1915, Carrie Chapman Catt, a leader of the fight for woman suffrage, helped create the Woman’s Peace Party, with a small but active membership. As the war in Europe intensified, the party’s efforts to keep the United States from intervening grew.
Women peace activists were sharply divided once America entered the war in 1917. The National American Woman Suffrage Association, the largest women’s organization, supported the war and, more than that, presented itself as a patriotic organization dedicated to advancing the war effort. Its membership grew dramatically as a result. Catt, who was among those who abandoned the peace cause, now began calling for woman suffrage as a ’’war measure,” to ensure that women (whose work was essential to the war effort) would feel fully a part of the nation. But many other women refused to support the war even after April 1917. Among them were Jane Addams, who was widely reviled as a result, and Charlotte Perkins Gilman, a leading feminist activist.
Women peace activists shared many of the same objections to the war as did the members of the Socialist Party (to which some of them belonged). But some criticized the war on other grounds as well, arguing that as ’’the
mother half of humanity,” they had a special moral and mater-
nal basis for their pacifism.
Maternal Opposition to War
Selling the War and Suppressing Dissent
World War I was not as popular among the American people as World War II would be, but most of the country supported the intervention once it began. In communities across the nation, there were outbursts of fervent patriotism, floods of voluntary enlistments in the military, and greatly increased displays of patriotism. Women joined their local Red Cross in an effort to contribute to the war effort. Children raised money for war bonds in their schools. Churches included prayers for the president and the troops in their services. And the war also gave a large boost to the wave of religious revivalism that had been growing for a decade before 1917; revivalism, in turn, became a source of support for the war. Billy Sunday, the leading revivalist of his time, dropped his early opposition to intervention in 1917 and became a fervent champion of the American military effort.
Nevertheless, government leaders (and many others) remained deeply concerned about the significant minorities who continued to oppose the war even after the United States entered the conflict. Many believed that a crucial prerequisite
WARTIME PROPAGANDA
This poster—one of many lurid images of imperial Germany used by the U.S. government to generate enthusiasm for American involvement in World War |-shows bloodstained German boots with the German eagle clearly visible. The demonization of Germany was at the heart of government efforts to portray the war to Americans. (The Library of Congress (LC-USZC4-9853)) CONSIDER THE SOURCE /
J
□ Arc rcMHCD AMR MUCH CAN BE LEARNED ABOUT A SOCIETY’S VALUES from how it handles rhe
RACE, GENDER, AND .
„ , , r , raising of an army. In wartime, nations typically clarify the terms of citizenship MILITARY SERVICE and service—asking some people to fight, others to stay home, and appealing to the public for participation and support. The government sets the terms of service, but
they must align with popular values to be successful.
During World War I, as part of the broad national effort to explain, justify, and fight
the war, the government disseminated the two posters below (the "1917-1918” documents). The first poster was part of a recruiting drive for the U.S. Navy; the second was part of a campaign to sell "liberty loans/' interest-bearing bonds that funded roughly two-thirds of the war's $32 billion price tag. Both images suggest that women not only served in the military and industrial sectors-they also served as symbols.
By the time of the war on terrorism of the early twenty-first century, the landscape of military recruitment had changed dramatically. The new war was more limited in scale than World War I, and the draft had been suspended in 1973, converting the military to an allvolunteer force. This put a high premium on recruiting and marketing-and the materials used for those purposes remained just as illuminating as ever (see the "2006 2014” documents). In 2006, the U.S. Army launched its "Army Strong" campaign to communicate the message that
WORLD WAR 1-1917-1918
Wartime Posters
err. p
iwnw
AMAN i
ANO DO IT ;
UNITED SEMES NAVY
RECRUITING
SWno!f i VICTORY LIBERTY L
(The Library of Congress (LC-USZC4-9884))
(The Library of Congress (LC-USZC4-1124))
600 *
the army builds not only physical but also mental and emotional strengths in its recruits. The second images shows the welcoming attitude of today’s army.
UNDERSTAND, ANALYZE, AND EVALUATE
1.	How do the posters use images of women or the home to encourage either enlistment or financial support for the war?
2.	What do these posters say about contemporary understandings of gender roles? What did the state and society expect from men. What did they expect from women?
3.	Like almost all recruiting posters of World War I, these two depict white people—despite the fact that many African Americans and ethnic minorities served as well. What does that say about mainstream attitudes toward race and ethnicity during World War I?
WAR ON TERRORISM—2006-2014
KE CONNECTIONS
low do these sources portray the army? How are they persuasive? Is the ongoing war against terrorism
ivoked in any way?	Hifferentlv in these documents than in the 1917 and 1918 posters?
bo .bey »y any.Kn9 oboo. pop...
ttitudes? Explain.
. 601
602 « CHAPTER 21
for victory was an energetic, even coercive, effort to unite public opinion behind the military effort.
The most conspicuous government effort to rally public support was a vast propaganda campaign orchestrated by the CP*	new Committee on Public Information
(CPI). It was directed by the Denver journalist George Creel, who spoke openly of the importance of achieving social unity. The CPI supervised the distribution of tons of pro-war literature (75 million pieces of printed material). War posters plastered the walls of offices, shops, theaters, schools, churches, and homes. Newspapers dutifully printed official government accounts of the reasons for the war and the prospects for quick victory. Creel encouraged reporters to exercise "self censorship” when reporting news about the conflict.
As the war continued, the CPI’s tactics became increasingly crude. Government-promoted posters and films became lurid portrayals of the savagery of the Germans, bearing such titles as The Prussian Cur and The Kaiser: Beast of Berlin, encouraging Americans to think of the German people as something close to savages.
The government soon began more coercive efforts to suppress dissent. The CPI ran full-page advertisements in popular magazines like the Saturday Evening Post urging citizens to Espionage Act notify Justice Department when they encountered "the man who spreads the pessimistic stories . . . , cries for peace, or belittles our efforts to win the war.” The Espionage Act of 1917 gave the government new tools with which to respond to such reports. It created stiff penalties for spying, sabotage, or obstruction of the war effort (crimes that were often broadly defined); and it empowered the Post Office Department to ban "seditious” material from the mails. Sedition, Postmaster General Albert Sidney Burleson said, included statements that might ’’impugn the motives of the government and thus encourage insubordination,” anything that suggested "that the government is controlled by Wall Street or munitions manufacturers, or any other special interests.” He included in that category all publi-
cations of the Socialist Party.
More repressive were two measures of 1918: the Sabotage Act of April 20 and the Sedition Act of May 16. These bills
Sedition Act exPanded the meaning of the Espionage Act to make illegal any public expression of opposition to the war; in practice, it allowed officials to prose-
cute anyone who criticized the president or the government. The most frequent targets of the new legislation (and one of
the reasons for its enactment in the first place) were such anticapitalist groups (and antiwar) groups as the Socialist Party and the Industrial Workers of the World (IWW). Many Americans had favored the repression of socialists and radicals even before the war; the wartime policies now made it possible to move against them legally. Eugene V. Debs, the humane leader of the Socialist Party and an opponent of the war, was sentenced to ten years in prison in 1918. Only a pardon by President Warren G. Harding ultimately won his release in 1921. Big Bill Haywood and members of the IWW were especially energetically prosecuted. Only by fleeing to the Soviet
Repressing
Dissent
Union did Haywood avoid long imprisonment. More than 1,500 people were arrested in 1918 for the crime of criticizing the government.
State and local governments, corporations, universities, and private citizens contributed as well to the climate of repression. Vigilante mobs sprang up to ’’discipline” those who dared challenge the war. A dissident Protestant clergyman in Cincinnati was pulled from his bed one night by a mob, dragged to
a nearby hillside, and whipped ’’in the name of the women and children of Belgium.” An IWW organizer in Montana was seized by a mob and hanged from a railroad bridge.
A cluster of citizens’ groups emerged to mobilize "respectable” members of their communities to root out disloyalty. The American Protective League, probably the largest of such groups, enlisted the services of 250,000 people, who served as ’’agents”-prying into the activities and thoughts of their neighbors, opening mail, tapping telephones, and in general attempting to impose unity of opinion on their communities. It received government funds to support its work. Attorney General Thomas W. Gregory, a particularly avid supporter of repressing dissent, described the league and similar organizations approvingly as ’’patriotic organizations.” Other vigilante organizations-the National Security League, the Boy Spies of America, the American Defense Society-performed much the same function.
There were many victims of such activities: socialists, labor activists, female pacifists. But the most frequent targets of repression were immigrants: Irish Americans because of their historic "100 Percent anim°sity toward the British, Jews because Americanism” manY had expressed opposition to the anti-Semitic policies of the Russian government, and others. ’’Loyalist” citizens’ groups policed immigrant neighborhoods. They monitored meetings and even conversations for signs of disloyalty. Even some settlement house workers, many of whom had once championed ethnic diversity, contributed to such efforts. The director of the National Security League described the origins of the anti-immigrant sentiment, which was producing growing support for what many citizens were
now calling ’’100 percent Americanism”:
The melting pot has not melted. . . . There are vast communities in the nation thinking today not in terms of America, but in terms of Old World prejudices, theories, and animosities.
The greatest target of abuse was the German American community. Most German Americans supported the American war effort once it began. Still, public opinion turned bitterly hostile. A campaign to purge society of all things German quickly gathered speed, at times assuming ludicrous forms. Sauerkraut was renamed ’’liberty cabbage.” Frankfurters became ’’liberty sausage.” Performances of German music were frequently banned. German books were removed from the shelves of libraries. Courses in the German language were removed frOm school curricula; the California Board of Education called it ’’a language that disseminates the ideals of autocracy, rutality, and hatred.” Germans were routinely fired from jobs
AMERICA AND THE GREAT WAR
• 603 in war industries, lest they "sabotage” important tasks. Some were fired from positions entirely unrelated to the war-for example, Karl Muck, the German-born conductor of the Boston Symphony Orchestra. Vigilante groups routinely subjected Germans to harassment and beatings, including a lynching in southern Illinois in 1918. Relatively few Americans favored such extremes, but many came to agree with the belief of the eminent psychologist G. Stanley Hall that "there is something fundamentally wrong with the Teutonic soul.”
THE SEARCH FOR A NEW WORLD ORDER
Woodrow Wilson had led the nation into war promising a more just and stable peace at its conclusion. Well before the armistice, he was preparing to lead the fight for what he considered a democratic postwar settlement.
The Fourteen Points
Wilson’s
Idealistic
Vision
On January 8, 1918, Wilson appeared before Congress to present the principles for which he claimed the nation was fighting. The war aims had fourteen distinct provisions, widely known as the Fourteen Points; but they fell into three broad categories. First, Wilson’s proposals contained eight specific recommendations for adjusting postwar boundaries and for establishing new nations to replace the defunct Austro-Hungarian and Ottoman Empires. Those recommenda-
tions reflected his belief in the right of all peoples to self-determination. Second, there were five general principles to govern international conduct in the future: freedom of the seas, open covenants instead of secret treaties, reductions in armaments, free trade, and impartial mediation of colonial claims. Finally, there was a proposal for a league of nations that would help implement these new principles and territorial adjustments and resolve future controversies.
There were serious flaws in Wilson’s proposals. He provided no formula for deciding how to implement the "national self-determination” he promised for subjugated peoples. He said little about economic rivalries and their effect on international relations, even though such economic tensions had been in large part responsible for the war. Nevertheless, Wilson’s international vision quickly came to enchant not only much of his own generation (in both America and Europe), but also members of generations to come. It reflected his belief, strongly rooted in the ideas of progressivism, that the world was as capable of just and efficient government as were individual nations; that once the international community accepted certain basic principles °f conduct, and once it constructed modern institutions to implement them, the human race could live in peace.
The Fourteen Points were also an answer to the new
Bolshevik government in Russia. In December 1917, Lenin had
issued his own statement of war aims, strikingly similar to
Wilson’s. Wilson’s announcement, which came just three
weeks later, was, among other things, a last-minute (and un-
_	,	successful) effort to persuade the Bolshevik
Lenin’s	,	„
Challenge regime to keep Russia in the war. But Wilson also realized that Lenin was now a competitor in the effort to lead the postwar order. And he announced the Fourteen Points in part to ensure that the
world looked to the United States, not Russia, for guidance.
Early Obstacles
Wilson was confident, as the war neared its end, that popular support would enable him to win Allied approval of his peace plan. But there were ominous signs both at home and abroad that his path might be more difficult than he expected. In Europe, leaders of the Allied forces, many resenting what they considered Wilson’s tone of moral superiority, were preparing to resist him even before the armistice was signed. They had reacted unhappily when Wilson refused to make the United States their "ally” but had kept his distance as an "associate” of his European partners, keeping American military forces separate from the Allied armies they were joining.
Most of all, however, Britain and France, having suffered
incalculable losses in their long years of war, and having stored
.	up an enormous reserve of bitterness toward
Allied	r
Intransigence Germany as a result, were in no mood for a benign and generous peace. The British prime minister, David Lloyd George, insisted for a time that the German kaiser be captured and executed. He and Georges Clemenceau, president of France, remained determined to the end to gain something from the struggle to compensate them for
the catastrophe they had suffered.
At the same time, Wilson was encountering problems at
home. In 1918, with the war almost over, he unwisely appealed to the American voters to support his peace plans by electing Democrats to Congress in the November elections. A Republican victory, he declared, would be "interpreted on the other side of the water as a repudiation of my leadership.” Days later, the Republicans captured majorities in both houses. Domestic economic troubles, more than international issues, had been the most important factor in the voting; but because of the president’s ill-timed appeal, the results damaged his ability to claim broad popular support for his peace plans.
The leaders of the Republican Party, in the meantime, were developing their own reasons for opposing Wilson. Some were angry that he had tried to make the 1918 balloting a referendum on his war aims, especially since many Republicans had been supporting the Fourteen Points. Wilson further antagonized them when he refused to appoint any important Republicans to the negotiating team that would represent the United States at the peace conference in Paris. But the president considered such matters unimportant. Only one member of the American negotiating party would have any real authority: Wilson himself. And once he had produced a just and moral treaty, he believed, the weight of world and American opinion would compel his enemies to support him.
604 . CHAPTER 21
The Paris Peace Conference
Wilson arrived in Europe to a welcome such as few men in history have experienced. To the war-weary people of the Continent, he was nothing less than a savior, the man who would create a new and better world. When he entered Paris on December 13, 1918, he was greeted, some observers claimed, by the largest crowd in the history of France. The negotiations themselves, however, proved less satisfying.
The principal figures in the negotiations were the leaders of the victorious Allied nations: David Lloyd George representing Great Britain; Georges Clemenceau representing France; Vittorio Orlando, the prime minister of Italy; and Wilson, who hoped to dominate them all. From the beginning, the atmo-_	„	_	sphere of idealism Wilson had sought to
create was competing with a spirit of national aggrandizement. There was, moreover, a strong sense of unease about the unstable situation in eastern Europe and the threat of communism. Russia, whose new Bolshevik government was still fighting "White” counterrevolutionaries, was unrepresented in Paris; but the radical threat it seemed to pose to Western governments was never far from the minds of any
of the delegates, least of all Wilson himself.
Indeed, not long before he came to Paris, Wilson ordered the landing of American troops in the Soviet Union. They were there, he claimed, to help a group of 60,000 Czech soldiers trapped in Russia to escape. But the Americans soon became involved, at least indirectly, in assisting the White Russians (the anti-Bolsheviks) in their fight against the new regime. Some American troops remained in Russia as late as April 1920. Lenin’s
Wilson's
Retreat
regime survived these challenges. Wilson refused to recognize the new government. Diplomatic relations between the United States and the Soviet Union were not restored until 1933.
In the tense and often vindictive atmosphere of the negotiations in Paris, Wilson was unable to win approval of many of the broad principles he had espoused: freedom of the seas, which the British refused even to discuss; free trade; "open covenants openly arrived at” (the Paris negotiations themselves were often conducted in secret). Despite his support for
"impartial mediation” of colonial claims, he was forced to accept a transfer of German colonies in the Pacific to Japan; the British had promised them in exchange for Japanese assistance in the war. Wilson’s pledge of "national self-determination” for all peoples suffered numerous assaults. Economic and strategic demands were constantly coming into conflict with the principle of cultural nationalism.
The treaty departed most conspicuously from Wilson’s
ideals on the question of reparations. As the conference began,
the president opposed demanding compensation from the
~	~	defeated Central Powers. The other Allied
Reparations
leaders, however, were insistent, and slowly Wilson gave way and accepted the principle of reparations, the specific sum to be set later by a commission. That figure, established in 1921, was $56 billion, supposedly to pay for damages to civilians and for military pensions. Continued negotiations over the next decade scaled the sum back considerably. In the end, Germany paid only $9 billion, which was still more than its crippled economy could afford. The reparations, combined with other territorial and economic penalties,
THE BIG FOUR IN PARIS
Surface cordiality during the Paris Peace Conference disguised serious tensions among the so-called Big Four, the leaders of the victorious nations in World War I. As the conference progressed, the European leaders developed increasing resentment of Woodrow Wilson's high (and some of them thought sanctimonious) moral posture in the negotiations. Shown here are, from left to right, David Lloyd George of Great Britain, Vittorio Orlando of Italy, Georges Clemenceau of France, and Wilson. (The Library of Congress (LC-DIG-ggbain-29038)) 
AMERICA AND THE GREAT WAR
« 605 constituted an effort to keep Germany weak for the indefinite
future. Never again, the Allied leaders believed, should the
Germans be allowed to become powerful enough to threaten
the peace of Europe.
Wilson did manage to win some important victories in Paris in setting boundaries and dealing with former colonies. He secured approval of a plan to place many former colonies and imperial possessions (among them Palestine) in "trusteeship” under the League of Nations-the so-called mandate system. He blocked a French proposal to break up western Germany into a group of smaller states. He helped design the creation of two new nations: Yugoslavia and Czechoslovakia, which were welded together out of, among other territories, pieces of the former Austro-Hungarian Empire. Each nation contained an uneasy collection of ethnic groups that had frequently battled one another in the past.
But Wilson’s most visible triumph, and the one most important to him, was the creation of a permanent international organization to oversee world affairs and prevent future wars.
League of	On JanuarY 25, 1919, the Allies voted to
Nations	accept the "covenant” of the League of
Nations; and with that, Wilson believed, the peace treaty was transformed from a disappointment into a success. Whatever mistakes and inequities had emerged from the peace conference, he was convinced, could be cor-
rected later by the League.
The covenant provided for an assembly of nations that would meet regularly to debate means of resolving disputes and protecting the peace. Authority to implement League decisions would rest with a nine-member executive council; the United States would be one of five permanent members of the council, along with Britain, France, Italy, and Japan. The covenant left many questions unanswered, most notably how the League would enforce its decisions. Wilson, however, was confident that once established, the new organization would find suitable answers.
The Ratification Battle
Wilson was well aware of the political obstacles awaiting him at home. Many Americans, accustomed to their nation’s isolation from Europe, questioned the wisdom of this major new commitment to internationalism. Others had serious reservations about the specific features of the treaty and the covenant. After a brief trip to Washington in February 1919, during which he listened to harsh objections to the treaty from members of the Senate and others, he returned to Europe and insisted on several modifications in the covenant to satisfy his critics. The revisions ensured that the United States would not be obliged to accept a League mandate to oversee a territory and that the League would not challenge the Monroe Doctrine, but the changes were not enough to mollify his opponents, and Wilson refused to go further.
Wilson presented the Treaty of Versailles (which took its
name from the palace outside Paris where the final negotiating
sessions had taken place) to the Senate on July 10, 1919, asking,
Dare we reject it and break the heart of the world? In the
Wilson’s weeks that followed, he refused to consider Intransigence even the most innocuous compromise. His deteriorating physical condition-he was suffering from hardening of the arteries and had apparently experienced something like a mild stroke (undiagnosed) in
Paris-may have contributed to his intransigence.
The Senate, in the meantime, was raising many objections. Some senators-the fourteen so-called irreconcilables, many of them western isolationists-opposed the agreement on principle. But other opponents, with less fervent convictions, were principally concerned with constructing a winning issue for the Republicans in 1920 and with weakening a president whom some members of the Senate had come to despise. Most notable of these was Senator Henry Cabot Lodge of Massachusetts, the Henry Cabot powerful chairman of the Foreign Relations Lodge	Committee. A man of stunning arrogance
and a close friend of Theodore Roosevelt
(who had died early in 1919, spouting hatred of Wilson to the end), Lodge loathed the president with genuine passion. "I never thought I could hate a man as I hate Wilson,” he once admitted. He used every possible tactic to obstruct, delay, and amend the treaty. Wilson, for his part, despised Lodge as much as Lodge despised him.
Public sentiment clearly favored ratification, so at first Lodge could do little more than play for time. When the document reached his committee, he spent two weeks slowly reading aloud each word of its 300 pages; then he held six weeks of public hearings to air the complaints of every disgruntled minority (Irish Americans, for example, angry that the settlement made no provision for an independent Ireland). Gradually, Lodge’s general opposition to the treaty crystallized into a series of "reservations’-amendments to the League covenant limiting American obligations to the organization.
At this point, Wilson might still have won approval if he had agreed to some relatively minor changes in the language of the treaty. But the president refused to yield. When he realized the Senate would not budge, he decided to appeal to the public.
Wilson's Ordeal
What followed was a political disaster and a personal tragedy. Wilson embarked on a grueling, cross-country speaking tour to arouse public support for the treaty. In a little more than three weeks, he traveled over 8,000 miles by train, speaking as often as four times a day, resting hardly at all. Finally, he reached the end of his strength. After speaking at Pueblo, Colorado, on September 25, he collapsed with severe headaches. Canceling the rest of his itinerary, he rushed back to Washington, D.C., where, a few days later, he suffered a major stroke. For two weeks he was close to death; for six weeks more, he was so seriously ill that he could conduct virtually no public business. His wife and his doctor formed an almost impenetrable barrier around him, shielding him from any official pressures that might impede his recovery, preventing the public from receiving any accurate information about the gravity of his condition.
606 * CHAPTER 21
League
Membership
Rejected
Wilson ultimately recovered enough to resume a limited official schedule, but he was essentially an invalid for the remaining eighteen months of his presidency. His left side was partially paralyzed; more important, like many stroke victims, he had only partial control of his mental and emotional state. His condition only intensified what had already been his strong tendency to view public issues in moral terms and to resist any
attempts at compromise. When the Senate Foreign Relations Committee finally sent the treaty to the full Senate for ratification, recommending nearly fifty amendments and reservations, Wilson refused to consider any of them. When the full Senate voted in November to accept fourteen of the reservations, Wilson gave stern directions to his Democratic allies: they must vote only for a treaty with no changes whatsoever; any other version must be defeated. On November 19, 1919, forty-two Democrats, following the president’s instructions, joined with the thirteen Republican "irreconcilables” to reject the amended treaty. When the Senate voted on the original version without any reservations, thirty-eight senators, all but one Democrats, voted to approve it; fifty-five senators (some Democrats among them) voted no.
There were sporadic efforts to revive the treaty over the next few months. But Wilson’s opposition to anything but the precise settlement he had negotiated in Paris remained too formidable an obstacle. He was, moreover, becoming convinced that the 1920 national election would serve as a "solemn referendum” on the League. By now, however, public interest in the peace process had begun to fade-partly as a reaction against the tragic bitterness of the ratification fight, but more in response to a series of other crises.
A SOCIETY IN TURMOIL
Even during the Paris Peace Conference, many Americans were less concerned about international matters than about turbulent
WT „	events at home. The American economy ex-
New Social	,	\ ,
Environment perienced a severe postwar recession. And much of middle-class America responded to demands for change with a fearful, conservative hostility. The aftermath of war brought not the age of liberal reform that progressives had predicted, but a period of repression and reaction.
Industry and Labor
Citizens of Washington, D.C., on the day after the armistice, found it impossible to place long-distance telephone calls: the lines were jammed with officials of the war agencies canceling government contracts. The fighting had ended sooner than anyone had anticipated, and without warning, without planning, the nation was launched into the difficult task of economic reconversion.
At first, the wartime boom continued. But the postwar
prosperity rested largely on the lingering effects of the war
(government deficit spending continued for some months
after the armistice) and on sudden, temporary demands (a
UNION MEMBERSHIP, 1900—1920
This chart illustrates the steady increase in union membership in the first part of the twentieth century—a membership dominated by unions associated with the AFL. Note the particularly sharp increase between 1915 and 1920, the years of World War I. • W/?^ did the war years see such an expansion of union labor?
booming market for scarce consumer goods at home and a strong market for American products in the war-ravaged nations of Europe). This brief postwar boom was accompanied, however, by raging inflation, a result in part of the rapid abandonment of wartime price controls. Through most of 1919 and 1920, prices rose at an average of more than 15 percent a year.
Finally, late in 1920, the economic bubble burst, as many of the temporary forces that had created it disappeared and as inflation began killing the market for consumer goods. Between
Postwar 1920 and 1921, the gross national product
Recession (GNP) declined nearly 10 percent; 100,000 businesses went bankrupt; 453,000 farmers lost their land; nearly 5 million Americans lost their jobs. In this unpromising economic environment, leaders of organized labor set out to consolidate the advances they had made in the war, which now seemed in danger of being lost. The raging inflation of 1919 wiped out the modest wage gains workers had achieved during the war; many laborers worried about job security as hundreds of thousands of veterans returned to the workforce; arduous working conditions-such as the twelve-hour workday in the steel industry-continued to be a source of discontent. Employers aggravated the resentment by using the end of the war (and the end of government controls) to
AMERICA AND THE GREAT WAR * 607
rescind benefits they had been forced to give workers in 1917
and 1918-most notably recognition of unions.
The year 1919, therefore, saw an unprecedented wave of strikes-more than 3,600 in all, involving over 4 million workers. In January, a walkout by shipyard workers in Seattle, Washington, evolved into a general strike that brought the entire city almost to a standstill. The mayor requested and received the assistance of U.S. Marines to keep the city running, and eventually the strike failed. But the brief success of a general strike, something Americans associated with European radicals, made the Seattle incident reverberate loudly throughout the country.
In September, there was a strike by the Boston police force,
which was responding to layoffs and wage cuts by demanding
recognition of its union. Seattle had re-Boston Police .	,	„	,	,	.	..
Strike	mained generally calm during its strike;
but with its police off the Job, Boston erupted in violence and looting. Efforts by local businessmen, veterans, and college students to patrol the streets proved ineffective; and finally Governor Calvin Coolidge called in the National Guard to restore order. (His public statement that ’'there is no right to strike against the public safety by anybody, anywhere, any time” attracted national
Steelworkers’
Strike
Defeated
acclaim.) Eventually, Boston officials dismissed the entire police force and hired a new one.
In September 1919, the greatest strike in American history began, when 350,000 steelworkers in several eastern and mid-western cities walked off the job, demanding an eight-hour workday and recognition of their union. The steel strike was long, bitter, and violent-most of the violence coming from employers, who hired armed guards to disperse
picket lines and escort strikebreakers into factories. It climaxed in a riot in Gary, Indiana, in which eighteen strikers were killed. Steel executives managed to keep most plants running with nonunion labor, and public opinion was so hostile to the strikers that the AFL-having at first endorsed the strike-soon timidly repudiated it. By January, the strike had collapsed. It was a setback from which organized labor would not recover for more than a decade.
The Demands of African Americans
The nearly 400,000 black men who had served in the armed forces during the war came home in 1919 and marched
in Front of a store where broken windows suggest looting has already occurred, during the Boston Police Strike
the BOSTON POLICE STRIKE National Guardsmen stand guard
°f 1919. (© Bettmann/Corbis)
608 « CHAPTER 21
down the main streets of the industrial cities with other returning troops. And then (in New York and other cities), they marched again through the streets of black neighborhoods such as Harlem, led by jazz bands, cheered by thousands of African Americans, worshiped as heroes. The black soldiers were an inspiration to thousands of urban African Americans, a sign, they thought, that a new age had come, that the glory of black heroism in the war would make it impossible for white society ever again to treat African Americans as less than equal citizens. W. E. B. Du Bois, watching the African American soldiers returning home, conveyed his hopes for a new life for them. "We are returning from war!” he wrote, "The Crisis and tens of thousands of black men were drafted into the great struggle . . . we fought gladly and to the last drop of blood; for America and her highest ideals, we fought in far-off hope.” But recalling the past he added, "This country of ours, despite all its better souls have done and dreamed, is yet a shameful land.”
In fact, that black soldiers had fought in the war had almost no impact on white attitudes. But it did have a profound effect on black attitudes: it accentuated African American bitterness-
_.	„	and increased black determination to fight
New Black	°
Attitudes f°r r^eir ri^ts. For soldiers, there was an
expectation of some social reward for their service. For many other African Americans, the war had raised economic expectations, as they moved into industrial and other jobs vacated by white workers, jobs to which they had previously had no access. Just as black soldiers expected their military service to enhance their social status, so black factory workers regarded their move north as an escape from racial prejudice and an opportunity for economic gain.
Chicago Race Riots
By 1919, however, the racial climate had become savage and murderous. In the South, there was a sudden increase in lynchings: more than seventy blacks, some of them war veterans, died at the hands of white mobs in 1919 alone. In the North, black factory workers faced widespread layoffs as returning white veterans displaced them from their jobs. African American veterans found no significant new opportunities for advancement. Rural black migrants to northern cities encountered white communities unfamiliar with and generally hostile to them; and as whites became convinced that black workers with lower wage demands were hurting them economically, animosity grew rapidly.
The wartime riots in East St. Louis and elsewhere were a prelude to a summer of much worse racial violence in 1919.
In Chicago, a black teenager swimming in Lake Michigan on a hot July day happened to drift toward a white beach. Whites
on shore allegedly stoned him unconscious; he sank and drowned. Angry blacks gathered in crowds and marched into white neighborhoods to retaliate; whites formed even larger crowds and roamed into black neighborhoods shooting, stabbing, and beating passersby, destroying homes and properties. For more than a week, Chicago was virtually at war. In the end, 38 people died-15 whites and 23 blacks-and 537 were injured; over 1,000 people were left homeless. The Chicago riot was the worst but not the only racial violence during the so-called red summer of 1919; in all, 120 people died in such racial outbreaks in little more than three months.
Racial violence, and even racially motivated urban riots, was not new. The deadliest race riot in American history had
THE FIFTEENTH REGIMENT ON FIFTH AVENUE
The all-black Fifteenth Army Regiment marches up Fifth Avenue in New York City in 1917, shortly after the United States entered World War I. They are en route to an army training camp in New York State before traveling to the front in Europe. Less than two years later, many of these same men marched through Harlem on their return from the war, and again down Fifth Avenue, before cheering crowds— convinced, wrongly, that their service in the war would win them important new freedoms at home. (© Bettmann/Corbis) AMERICA AND THE GREAT WAR . 609
occurred in New York during the Civil War. But the 1919 riots were different in one respect: they did not just involve white people attacking blacks; they also involved blacks fighting back. The NAACP signaled this change by urging African Americans not just to demand government protection, but also to retaliate, to defend themselves. The poet Claude McKay, one of the major figures of what would shortly be known as the Harlem Renaissance, wrote a poem after the Chicago riot called "If We Must Die”:
Like men we’ll face the murderous cowardly pack. Pressed to the wall, dying, but fighting back.
Marcus Garvey’s Black Nationalism
At the same time, a Jamaican, Marcus Garvey, began to attract a wide American following-mostly among poor urban blacks-with an ideology of black nationalism. Garvey encouraged African Americans to take pride in their own achievements and to develop an awareness of their African heritage-to reject assimilation into white society and develop pride in what Garvey argued was their own superior race and culture. His United Negro Improvement Association
(UNIA) launched a chain of black-owned grocery stores and pressed for the creation of other black businesses. Eventually, Garvey began urging his supporters to leave America and "return” to Africa, where they could create a new society of their own. In the 1920s, the Garvey movement experienced explosive growth for a time; and the UNIA became notable for its mass rallies and parades, for the opulent uniforms of its members, and for the growth of its enterprises. It began to decline, however, after Garvey was indicted in 1923 on charges of business fraud. He was deported to Jamaica two years later. But
the allure of black nationalism, which he helped make visible to millions of African Americans, survived in black culture long after Garvey himself was gone.
The Red Scare
To much of the white middle class at the time, the industrial warfare, the racial violence, and other forms of dissent all appeared to be frightening omens of instability and radicalism. This was in part because the Russian Revolution of November 1917 made it clear that communism was no longer simply a theory, but now an important regime.
Concerns about the communist threat grew in 1919 when the Soviet government announced the formation of the Communist International (or Comintern), whose purpose was to export revolution around the world. And in America itself, there were, in addition to the great number of imagined radicals, a modest number of real ones. The American Communist Party was formed in 1919, and there were other radical groups (many of them dominated by immigrants from Europe who had been involved in radical politics before coming to America). Some of these radicals were presumably responsible for a series of bombings in the spring of 1919 that produced great national alarm. In April, the Post Office Department, intercepted several dozen parcels addressed to leading businessmen and politicians that were triggered to explode when opened. Several of them reached their destinations, and one of them exploded, severely injuring a domestic servant of a public official in Georgia. Two months later, eight bombs exploded in eight cities within minutes of one another, suggesting a nationwide conspiracy. One of them damaged the
1910
1950
PERCENT OF TOTAL POPULATION 50%-75°/o
□ 10%-25% □ 0%-5% 25%—50%	Q 5%-10%
-CAN aMER,caN m,GRaT1ON, r-W50 -
„y ,950 and	de^e of	, Parta of tha s-. no, in	tha
hanges in Mississippi and South Carolina.
Why did the wars produce such significant migration out of the South.
610 * CHAPTER 21
!
MARCUS GARVEY
Marcus Garvey rejected the idea of African Americans assimilating into white society. Instead, he encouraged his supporters to leave America and "return” to Africa to create their own society. (Private Collection/© Peter Newark American Pictures/ Bridgeman Images) facade of Attorney General A. Mitchell Palmer’s home in Washington. In 1920, there was a terrible explosion in front of the Morgan bank on Wall Street, which killed thirty people (only one of them-a clerk-in the bank itself).
The bombings crystallized what was already a growing determination among many middle-class Americans (and some „	government officials) to fight back against
Antiradicalism radicalism-a determination steeled by the repressive atmosphere of the war years.
This antiradicalism accompanied, and reinforced, the already strong commitment among old-stock Protestants to the idea of "100 percent Americanism.” And it produced what became known as the Red Scare.
Antiradical newspapers and politicians now began to portray almost every form of instability or protest as a sign of a radical threat. Race riots, one newspaper claimed, were the work of "armed revolutionaries running rampant through our cities.” The steel strike, the Philadelphia Inquirer claimed, was "penetrated with the Bolshevik idea . . . steeped in the doctrines of the class struggle and social overthrow.” Nearly thirty states enacted new peacetime sedition laws imposing harsh penalties on those who promoted revolution; some 300 people went to jail as a result-many of them people whose "crime” had been nothing more than opposition to the war. There were spontaneous acts of violence against supposed radicals in some communities. A mob of off-duty soldiers in New York City ransacked the offices of a socialist newspaper and beat up its staff. Another mob, in Centralia, Washington, dragged an IWW agitator from jail and castrated him before hanging him from a
bridge. Citizens in many communities removed "subversive” books from the shelves of libraries; administrators in some universities dismissed "radical” members from their faculties. Women’s groups such as the National Consumers League came under attack by antiradicals because so many feminists had opposed American intervention in the fighting in Europe.
Perhaps the greatest contribution to the Red Scare came from the federal government. On New Year’s Day, 1920, Attorney General A. Mitchell Palmer and his ambitious assistant, J. Edgar Hoover, orchestrated a series of raids on alleged radical centers throughout the country and arrested more than 6,000 people.
The Palmer Raids had been intended to uncover large
Palmer Raids caches of weaPons and explosives; they discovered only three pistols. Most of those arrested were ultimately released, but about 500 who were
not American citizens were summarily deported.
The ferocity of the Red Scare soon abated, but its effects
lingered well into the 1920s, most notably in the celebrated
Sacco and case of Sacco and Vanzetti-In MaV l920’ Vanzetti two Italian immigrants, Nicola Sacco and Bartolomeo Vanzetti, were charged with the murder of a paymaster in Braintree, Massachusetts. The evidence against them was questionable; but because both men were confessed anarchists, they faced a widespread public presumption of guilt. They were convicted in a trial of extraordinary injudiciousness, before an openly prejudiced judge, Webster Thayer, and were sentenced to death. Over the next several years, public support for Sacco and
AMERICA AND THE GREAT WAR . 611
Vanzetti grew to formidable proportions. But all requests for a new trial or a pardon were denied. On August 23, 1927, amid widespread protests around the world, Sacco and Vanzetti, still proclaiming their innocence, died in the electric chair. Theirs was a cause that a generation of Americans never forgot.
Refuting the Red Scare
An unexpected result of postwar turmoil was the emergence of a vigorous defense of civil liberties that not only discredited the Red Scare, but helped give new force of the Bill of Rights as well. The heavy-handed actions of the federal government after the war created a powerful backlash. It destroyed the career of A. Mitchell Palmer. It almost nipped in the bud the ascent of J. Edgar Hoover. It damaged the Democratic Party. And it led to an organization committed to protecting civil liberties: the National Civil Liberties Bureau, launched in 1917, which in 1920 was renamed the American Civil Liberties Union (ACLU), which remains a prominent institution today. At the same time, members of the Supreme
THE PALMER RAIDS
In the years following World War I, many Americans feared pohtica radicalism, especially from the left. The United States Department of Justice, led by Attorney General A. Mitchell Palmer, conducted raids and arrested and deported more than 500 foreign citizens, including several prominent leftist leaders. (© Everett Collection Inc./Alamy) Court-most notably Justices Oliver Wendell Holmes and Louis Brandeis-gradually moved toward a strong position of defense of unpopular speech. The clash of "fighting faiths/’ Holmes wrote in a dissent in 1920, was best resolved "by free trade in ideas-that the best test of truth is ... the competition of the market.” This and other dissents eventually became law as other justices committed themselves to a robust defense of speech, however unpopular.
The Retreat from Idealism
On August 26, 1920, the Nineteenth Amendment, guaranteeing women the right to vote, became part of the Constitution. To the woman suffrage movement, this was the culmination of nearly a century of struggle. To many progressives, who had seen the inclusion of women in the electorate as a way of bolstering their political strength, it seemed to promise new support for reform. In some respects, the amendment helped fulfill that promise. Because of woman suffrage, members of Congress-concerned that women would vote as a bloc on the basis of women’s issues-passed the Sheppard-Towner Maternity and Infancy Act in 1921, one of the first pieces of federal welfare legislation that provided funds for supporting the health of women and infants. Concern about the women’s vote also appeared to create support for the 1922 Cable Act, which granted women the rights of U.S. citizenship independent of their husbands’ status, and for the proposed (but never ratified) 1924 constitutional amendment to outlaw child labor.
In other ways, however, the Nineteenth Amendment marked less the beginning of an era of reform than an ending. Economic problems, feminist demands, labor unrest, racial tensions, and the intensity of the antiradicalism they helped create-all combined in the years immediately following the war to produce a general sense of disillusionment.
That became particularly apparent in the election of 1920. Woodrow Wilson wanted the campaign to be a referendum on the League of Nations, and the Democratic candidates, Ohio governor James M. Cox and Assistant Secretary of the Navy
Return to Franklin D. Roosevelt, tried to keep Wilson’s "Normalcy” ideals alive. The Republican presidential nominee, however, offered a different vision. He was Warren Gamaliel Harding, an obscure Ohio senator whom party leaders had chosen as their nominee confident that he would do their bidding once in office. Harding offered few ideals, only a vague promise of a return, as he later phrased it, to "normalcy.” He won in a landslide. The Republican ticket received 61 percent of the popular vote and carried every state outside the South. The party made major gains in Congress as well. Woodrow Wilson, who had tried and failed to create a postwar order based on democratic ideals, stood repudiated. Early in 1921, he retired to a house on S Street in Washington, where he lived quietly until his death in 1924. In the meantime, for most Americans,
a new era had begun.
612 * CHAPTER 21
LOOKING BACK
The greatest and most terrible war in human history to that point was also an important moment in the rise of the United States to global preeminence. The powers of Europe emerged from more than four years of carnage with their societies and economies in disarray. The United States emerged from its own, much briefer, involvement in the war poised to become the most important political and economic force in the world.
For a time after the outbreak of war in Europe in 1914, most Americans-President Wilson among them-wanted to stay out of the conflict. Gradually, however, as the war dragged on and the tactics of Britain and Germany began to impinge on American trade and on freedom of the seas, the United States found itself drawn into the conflict. In April 1917, finally, Congress agreed (although not without considerable dissent) to the president’s request that the United States enter the war as an ally of Britain.
American forces quickly broke the stalemate that had bogged the European forces down in years of inconclusive trench warfare. Within a few months after the arrival of substantial numbers of American troops in Europe, Germany agreed to an armistice and the war shuddered to a close. American casualties, although not inconsiderable, were negligible compared to the millions suffered by the European combatants. In the meantime, the American economy experienced an enormous industrial boom as a result of the war.
Key Terms/People/Places/Events
Allies 589 Central Powers 589 Dollar Diplomacy 587 General John J. Pershing 589 "Great Migration” 598 League of Nations 605 Ludlow Massacre 597 Lusitania 590 Marcus Garvey 609
RECALL AND REFLECT
1.	Who opposed U.S. involvement in World War I and why?
2.	How did the Wilson administration mobilize the nation for war?
3.	What effect did the war have on race relations in the
United States?
Nicola Sacco and Bartolomeo Vanzetti 610
Nineteenth Amendment 611 Palmer Raids 610 Pancho Villa 589 Red Scare 609 Roosevelt Corollary 585 Senator Henry Cabot Lodge 605 The Fourteen Points 603
The social experience of the war in the United States was, on the whole, dismaying to reformers. Although the war enhanced some reform efforts-most notably prohibition and woman suffrage-it also introduced an atmosphere of intolerance and repression into American life, an atmosphere assisted by policies of the federal government designed to suppress dissent. The aftermath of the war was even more disheartening to progressives, both because of a brief but highly destabilizing recession and because of a wave of repression directed against labor, radicals, African Americans, and immigrants in 1919 and 1920.
At the same time, Woodrow Wilson’s bold and idealistic dream of a peace based on the principles of democracy and justice suffered a painful death. The Treaty of Versailles, which he helped to draft, was itself far from what Wilson had hoped. It did, however, contain a provision for a League of Nations, which Wilson believed could transform the international order. But the League quickly became controversial in the United States; and despite strenuous efforts by the president-efforts that hastened his own physical collapse-the treaty was defeated in the Senate. In the aftermath of that traumatic battle, the American people seemed to turn away from Wilson’s ideals and entered a very different era.
Treaty of Versailles 605 Trench warfare 594 Triple Alliance 589 Triple Entente 589 United Negro Improvement
Association 609 Zimmermann telegram 591
4.	What were some of the ways that U.S. participation in the Great War changed American society?
5.	Why did the battle over ratification of the Treaty of Versailles come to an impasse? Why did the Senate ultimately reject the treaty? What was the significance of that rejection?
AMERICA AND THE GREAT WAR * 613
SIGNIFICANT EVENTS
1904
"Roosevelt Corollary" announced
1905
Roosevelt mediates settlement of Russo-Japanese War
1914
World War I begins Panama Canal opens
1918
Sedition Act passed Armistice ends war (November 11)
Paris Peace Conference convenes
Wilson announces the Fourteen Points
1916
Wilson reelected president
U.S. troops pursue Pancho Villa into Mexico
1915
Great Migration of blacks to the North begins Lusitania torpedoed
1919
Treaty of Versailles signed Senate rejects treaty
Race riots break out in Chicago and other cities
Workers engage in steel strike and other unrest
1917
Germany announces unrestricted submarine warfare
United States declares war on Central Powers Selective Service Act passed War Industries Board created Bolshevik Revolution in Russia
1920
Nineteenth Amendment gives suffrage to women
Federal government reacts to "radicalism" with Palmer Raids and Red Scare
Warren G. Harding elected president
1927
Sacco and Vanzetti executed
!
THE “NEW ERA”
THE GREAT GATSBY F.
Scott Fitzgerald's great novel, one of the most famous of the "Lost Generation," critiques the excesses of capitalism and explores the personal sense of alienation experienced by many in the years following World War I. (© Getty Images News/ Getty Images) I
LOOKING AHEAD
1.	How did the technological innovations of the early twentieth century affect industry and American social life of the 1920s?
2.	What were some of the cultural conflicts of the 1920s, and what caused them?
3.	Is the term the "New Era" a fitting description of the 1920s?
SETTING THE STAGE
THE IMAGE OF THE 1920S IN THE
American popular imagination is of an era of affluence, conservatism, and cultural frivolity. In reality, the decade was a time of significant and dramatic social, economic, and political change. During this era the American economy enjoyed spectacular growth and developed new forms of organization as well. A new urban, industrial, consumer-oriented culture emerged. American government, for all its apparent conservatism, experimented with new approaches to public policy. To a large degree, these changes were the result of industrialization, the rapid growth of cities, and the increasing size and power of the middle class. Contemporaries liked to refer to the 1920s as the "New Era"—an age in which America was becoming a modern nation. The idea of a New Era embraced the belief that the New Era was a time of liberation—in which people could reject traditional social restraints and live a freer life less constrained by tradition and propriety.
But these same challenges to traditional values and ways of life also made the 1920s a turbulent era in which the nation experienced substantial cultural conflict, Many Americans rebelled against the new customs and morals of the urban middle class and sought to defend older values. The intense cultural conflicts of the 1920s were evidence of how many Americans remained outside the reach of the new affluent, consumer culture—some because their economic and social circumstances barred them from it, others because they found the character of this culture alien and unfulfilling. The New Era's exuberant modernization, in short, contributed to deep divisions in both politics and culture.
THE NEW ECONOMY
After the recession of 1921-1922, the United States began a period of almost uninterrupted prosperity and economic expansion. Less visible at the time, but equally significant, was the survival (and even the growth) of inequalities and imbalances.
Technology and Economic Growth
No one could deny the remarkable, some believed miraculous, feats of the American economy in the 1920s. The nation’s manufacturing output rose by more than 60 percent during the decade. Per capita income grew by a third. Inflation was negligible. A mild recession in 1923 interrupted the pattern of growth, but when it subsided early in 1924, the economy expanded with greater vigor than before.
The economic boom was a result of many factors. An immediate cause was the debilitation of European industry in the aftermath of World War 1, which left the United States for the next ten years or so the only truly healthy industrial power in the world. More important in the long run Sources of	was technology and the great industrial expansion it made possible. The auto-
the Boom	mobile industry, as a result of the development of the assembly line and other
innovations, now became one of the most important industries in the nation.
It stimulated growth in many related industries as well. Auto manufacturers purchased the products of steel, rubber, glass, and tool companies. Auto owners bought gasoline from the oil corpora tions. Road construction in response to the proliferation of motor vehicles became an important industry. The increased mobility the automobile made possible increased the demand for suburban housing, fueling a boom in the construction industry.
Other new industries benefiting from technological innovations contributed as well to the economic growth Radio began to become a popular technology even before commercial broadcasting began in 1920. Early radio had been able to broadcast little besides pulses,
RADI°	which meant that radio communication could occur only through the Morse
code But with the discovery of the theory of modulation, pioneered by the Canadian scientist Reginald Fessenden, it became possible to transmit speech and music. (Modulation also eventually made possible the transmission of video signals that later helped create radar and television.) Once
615
